Hawaii statutes.
§431N-4 Transfer of funds. The
department of health shall have the authority to utilize funds appropriated
under this chapter to directly purchase services in accordance with chapter
103F when it is determined that such a purchase is more effective and cost
efficient in meeting the goals of this chapter. The department of health shall
also have the authority to transfer funds appropriated under this chapter to
the department of human services. The department of human services may receive
and apply such funds for the purpose of maximizing medical care services to gap
group individuals under the medicaid program contained in the medicaid state
plan. The departments of health and human services shall develop and implement
an interagency working agreement necessary to carry out the purpose of this
section. [L 1989, c 378, pt of §1; am L 1991, c 335, §14; am L 1997, c 190, §6]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next